Massachusetts, session 194th, H4738.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1: Section 12 of the City of Holyoke Charter shall be amended by deleting the
current section in its entirety.
SECTION 2: Section 12 of the City of Holyoke Charter shall be further amended by
adding the following new section:
SECTION 12–Special Meetings of the City Council;
The Mayor or the President of the City Council may at any time call a special meeting of
the City Council by causing written notifications thereof, together with a statement of the
subjects to be considered thereat, to be electronically delivered to all Council members at least
48 hours prior to the commencement of the meeting. Members of the City Council may elect to
alternatively receive all such notices by mail, hand delivery to their place of residence, or to their
City Hall desk by designating their preference to the Clerk or the Assistant to the City Council.
of 2

SECTION 3: So much of Chapter 438 of the Acts of 1896 and Chapter 327 of the Acts of
1936 and acts in amendment thereof and addition thereto, as is inconsistent with this act, is
hereby repealed.
SECTION 4: The General Court may make clerical or editorial changes of form only to
the bill, unless the Mayor and City Council approve amendments before enactment by the
General Court. The Mayor and City Council are hereby authorized to approve amendments
which shall be within the scope of the general public objectives of this petition.
SECTION 5: This act shall take effect upon its approval.
of 2